Illinois, session 104th, HB1251.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by adding 5Section 25 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/25 new)7    Sec. 25. Manufacturer child care center incentive pilot 8program.9    (a) A manufacturer child care center incentive pilot 10program is created in the State. An applicant shall follow 11staffing, medication, background checks, and liability 12insurance requirements as contained in 89 Ill. Adm. Code 407, 13unless otherwise prescribed in this Section. The pilot program 14is limited to 10 sites and is available to any manufacturer who 15has a facility in the State. A manufacturer may apply on an 16individual basis or in a group of 2 or more manufacturers. A 17child care center must only be made available to employees of 18the manufacturer at no cost to the employee. 19    (b) The application shall include, but is not limited to, 20the following information: 21        (1) training, including universal precautions, 22    provided to staff to identify and minimize risks, 23    particularly as it relates to the care and supervision of   HB1251- 2 -LRB104 05870 HLH 15901 b1    children;2        (2) the design and maintenance of the building and any 3    vehicles used in the child care center;4        (3) maintenance and storage of food service and 5    maintenance equipment, chemicals, and supplies, including 6    an integrated pest management plan in accordance with 89 7    Ill. Adm. Code 407.390;8        (4) selection, maintenance, and supervision of 9    education materials, toys, pets, and playground equipment;10        (5) food service sanitation;11        (6) cleanliness of the building and grounds;12        (7) means of receiving information to alert the child 13    care center of severe weather conditions or other 14    emergency situations that may affect the safety of the 15    children; and16        (8) emergency and disaster preparedness plans, 17    including fire drills and evacuation plans. 18    (c) The child care center shall maintain a written policy 19regarding medications. The following are requirements 20regarding medications: 21        (1) Both prescription and nonprescription medication 22    shall be accepted only in their original container. 23    Prescription medications shall be labeled with the full 24    pharmacy label. Over-the-counter, or nonprescription, 25    medication shall be clearly labeled with the child's first 26    and last name. The container shall be in such condition   HB1251- 3 -LRB104 05870 HLH 15901 b1    that the name of the medication and directions for use are 2    clearly readable.3        (2) Medication shall be administered in a manner that 4    protects the safety of the child, including the following:5            (A) A specific staff person shall be designated to 6        administer and properly document the dispensation of 7        the medication each day.8            (B) Prescription medication shall be administered 9        as required by a physician subject to the receipt of 10        appropriate releases from parents, which shall be on 11        file and regularly updated. Prescription medication 12        shall be used only for the child named on the label.13            (C) Over-the-counter medications may be dispensed 14        in accordance with manufacturer's instructions when 15        provided by the parent with written permission.16            (D) The child care center shall maintain a record 17        of the dates, times administered, dosages, 18        prescription number, if applicable, and the name of 19        the person administering the medication.20        (3) Medications shall be safely stored, including the 21    following:22            (A) Medication containers shall have 23        child-protection caps whenever possible.24            (B) Medications, whether refrigerated or 25        unrefrigerated, shall be kept in locked cabinets or 26        other containers that are inaccessible to children and   HB1251- 4 -LRB104 05870 HLH 15901 b1        that are designated and used only for this purpose.2            (C) Medications shall be kept in a well-lighted 3        area.4            (D) Medications shall be kept out of the reach of 5        children.6            (E) Medication shall not be kept in rooms where 7        food is prepared or stored, unless refrigerated in a 8        separate locked container.9        (4) Medication shall not be used beyond the date of 10    expiration.11        (5) When a child no longer needs to receive 12    medication, the unused portion or empty bottle shall be 13    returned to the parent.14        (6) Any topical products, such as diaper ointment, 15    sunscreen, or insect repellent, whether supplied by the 16    parent or by the child care center, shall be approved by 17    the parent in writing prior to use on the child. 18    (d) The child care center shall require all persons 19subject to background checks, as defined in 89 Ill. Adm. Code 20385.20, to furnish written information regarding any criminal 21convictions, to submit to fingerprinting, and to authorize the 22background checks required by 89 Ill. Adm. Code 385. 23    (e) The Department shall create a website and application 24process for the pilot program that streamlines the application 25process and is maintained on the Department website. 26    (f) An application for the pilot program shall receive   HB1251- 5 -LRB104 05870 HLH 15901 b1priority consideration once submitted. A licensing visit must 2be conducted within 48 hours after receipt of application. 3    (g) The Department shall adopt rules to implement and 4administer the pilot program.  5    Section 10. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 6adding Section 246 as follows: 7    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)8    Sec. 246. Credit for manufacturers participating in the 9manufacturer child care center incentive pilot program.10    (a) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, 11each taxpayer who participates in the manufacturer child care 12center incentive pilot program established under Section 25 of 13the Child Care Act of 1969 is entitled to a credit against the 14taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in the 15amount of $250 per child enrolled in that taxpayer's child 16care center.17    (b) For partners and shareholders of Subchapter S 18corporations, there shall be allowed a credit under this 19Section to be determined in accordance with Section 251. 20    (c) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 21the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 22the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 23may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 245 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax   HB1251- 6 -LRB104 05870 HLH 15901 b1credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 2a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 3that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 4shall be applied first. 5    (d) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 6250. 7    (e) The Department shall adopt any rules necessary to 8implement and administer this Section.